Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Chapter 11

Office of Legislative Services

3-11-101. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 11, §§3-11-101 —3-11-103 (Acts 1977, ch. 89, §§ 4, 5; T.C.A., §§ 3-1101 — 3-1103), concerning the office of legislative services, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 1077, § 1, effective June 21, 2010.

3-11-102. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 11, §§3-11-101 —3-11-103 (Acts 1977, ch. 89, §§ 4, 5; T.C.A., §§ 3-1101 — 3-1103), concerning the office of legislative services, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 1077, § 1, effective June 21, 2010.

3-11-103. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 11, §§3-11-101 —3-11-103 (Acts 1977, ch. 89, §§ 4, 5; T.C.A., §§ 3-1101 — 3-1103), concerning the office of legislative services, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 1077, § 1, effective June 21, 2010.